District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

3-2301.06

Annual registration of nurses and schools; fees; failure to reregister; restoration; appeal from denial of registration or reregistration

Repealed.

History

Mar. 25, 1986, D.C. Law 6-99, § 1104(b), 33 DCR 729

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., §§ 2-1701.1 to 2-1701.10.